Hawaii statutes.
[§432E-44] Rules. The insurance
commissioner shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to effectuate the purpose
of this part including requirements for forms to request external review and
expedited external review, to request approval by independent review
organizations, and for disclosure of conflicts of interest by enrollees and
health carriers. [L 2011, c 230, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next